src/babyfst.xfscript
! ==============================================================
! BabyFST (Morpho)phonology v2.0              asahala 2020-02-24
! ==============================================================

set flag-is-epsilon ON

read lexc akkadian_noun_system.lexc
define MorphologyNouns

!read lexc akkadian_verb_system.lexc
read lexc akkadian_verbs_new.lexc
define MorphologyVerbs

read lexc akkadian_other_new.lexc
define Other

read lexc akkadian_names_new.lexc
define Names


! ==============================================================
! Phoneme system
! ==============================================================

define Yod [j|y] ;
define Aleph [ʾ|x] ;
define C [Aleph|b|d|g|h|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|ṣ|š|t|Ṫ|ṭ|z|w|Ẇ|Yod] ;
define CStrong C - Aleph ;
define V [a|e|i|u] ;
define VLong [ā|ē|ī|ū] ;
define VCont [â|ê|î|û] ;
define VAny [V|VLong|VCont] ;
define BackV [a|u|ā|ū] ;
define Char [VAny|C] ;
define Syllable [[ C VAny C ]|[ C VAny ]|[ VAny ]|[ VAny C ]] ;


define Testi Ṅ -> n
       .o. Ẋ (->) x
       .o. Ẋ -> ʾ
       .o. Ẇ -> w ;

! ==============================================================
! Feminine allomorphy defined here is redundant; rules cannot be
! easily defined due to interaction with the syncope. Perhaps 
! the only way would be to enumerate pVrVs and pVrs stems
! separately and assign them to different sublexica.
! ==============================================================

def FeminineAllomorphy FEMT (->) t || VAny (C) %> _
    .o.		   FEMT -> [ a t ] ;

define VentiveAllomorphy [ NIM ] -> [ n i m ] || [ā|ū|♀] %> _
      .o.                [ NIM ] -> [ a m ] || [ C | ♂ ] %> _
      .o.                [ NIM ] -> [ m ] 
      .o.                [ NI ] -> [ n i ] || [ā|ū] %> _
      .o.                [ NI ] -> [ a ] || C %> _ ;

define YaAllomorphy JA (->) [ y a ] || VAny %> _
       .o.          JA -> a || [ ū | u | û ] %> _
       .o.          JA -> ī
       .o.          a (->) ā || _ %> [[y|k|š] [a|u|i]]
       .o.          i (->) ī || _ %> [[y|k|š] [a|u|i]]  ;


def Morphophonemes FeminineAllomorphy .o. VentiveAllomorphy .o. YaAllomorphy;

! ==============================================================
! Syncope: Omission of unstressed vowels as in purus -> pursam 
! ==============================================================

define Syncope V (->) 0 || V CStrong _ CStrong %> VAny
       .o.     V (->) 0 || VAny %< CStrong _ CStrong %> VAny ;


! ==============================================================
! General lengthening of vowels before aleph as in 
!
! i+'huz -> īhuz
! ==============================================================

define VerbPrefixLengthening [ a %< [Aleph|w|j] ] (->) ā %<
       .o.                   [ t a %< j ] (->) [t %< ī] 
       .o.                   [ i %< [Aleph|w|j] ] -> ī %<
       .o.                   [ e %< [Aleph|w|j] ] -> ē %<
       .o.                   [ u %< [Aleph|w|j] ] -> ū %< ;

! II-infirmae present stem constraints
! TODO: Find an easier way
define IIweakRestriction ♀ -> 0 || _ [ %> [a|u|ū|i|C] ]
       .o.		 ♀ -> 0 || _ .#.
       .o. 		 ♂ -> 0 || _ [ %> VAny] ;

! Produce contracted variants of stems with long + short vowel
! combinations: iqīaš -> iqâš
define IIweakContraction [ā a] -> â 
       .o. 		 [ē a] -> ê 
       .o. 		 [ī a] (->) â 
       .o.               [ū a] (->) â ;

define VerbalAlternation VerbPrefixLengthening 
       .o.               IIweakRestriction 
       .o.               IIweakContraction ;

! ==============================================================
! General contractions over aleph and changes in weak radicals
!
! Deletions
!   rabiʾtu -> rabītu               
!   rabiʾātu -> rabiātu, rabiʾu -> rabīu
!
! Contractions
!  rabiʾātu -> rabâtu
!  ibniʾu -> ibnû
!  rubaʾu -> rubû
! ==============================================================

define AlephDeletion [ i Aleph %> ] (->) ī
       .o.	     Aleph (->) 0 || i _ %> BackV 
       .o.           Aleph (->) 0 || _ .#. ;

! @ OB|MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 37)
define AlephContraction [ V Aleph %> [u|ū] ] (->) [ %> û ]
       .o.              [ V Aleph %> [i|ī] ] (->) [ %> î ]
       .o.              [ V Aleph %> [i|ī|e|ē] ] -> [ %> ê ]
       .o.              [ [u|a] Aleph %> [a|ā] ] -> [ %> â ]
       .o.              [ [i|e] Aleph %> [a|ā] ] (->) [ %> â ]
       .o.              [ ā Aleph %> u ] (->) [ %> û ]
       .o.              [ ā Aleph %> i ] (->) [ %> î ]
       .o.              [ ā Aleph %> e ] (->) [ %> ê ]
       .o.              [ ā Aleph %> a ] (->) [ %> â ]
       .o.		Aleph (->) ʾ 
       .o. [Ẋ|x] -> 0 ; ! FIX THIS 

! @ MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 38) TODO: #w -> 0
define WawNasalization w (->) m
       .o.	       [ w w ] (->) [ m m ] || VAny _ VAny 
       .o.	       w (->) m || .#. _ ;

! @ MB|SB|NB|LB (Kouwenberg 2011: 737)
define WawDeletion [y|j|w] (->) 0 || .#. _ ;

! @ MA|NA (Kouwenberg 2011: 371)
define WawAssyrian [ w a ] (->) [ u ] || .#. _ 
       .o.	   w (->) Aleph || VAny _ VAny 
       .o.	   w (->) b || VAny _ VAny ; 

define Contraction AlephDeletion 
       .o. 	   WawNasalization 
       .o.	   WawDeletion
       .o.	   WawAssyrian
       .o. 	   AlephContraction ;


! ==============================================================
! Feminine alternations
!
! Note that e-colored feminine suffixes may rarely occur with
! stems that do not have /e/.
!
! FemEcolor          bēl+at -> bēl+et
! FemVoicing         bišim+tu -> bišim+du 
! ==============================================================

! @ OB|MB|SB|NB|LB
define FemEcolor [ a t ] (->) [ e t ] || [e|ē|ê] Char* %> _
       .o.       [ ā t ] (->) [ ē t ] || [e|ē|ê] Char* %> _ ;

define FemVoicing t (->) d || m %> _ ;

define FeminineAssimilations [d|n|Aleph] (->) t || _ %> t
       .o.		     t (->) ṭ || [q|ṭ] %> _ 
       .o.		     [ m %> t ] (->) [ n %> t ]
       .o.		     [ m %> t ] (->) [ n %> d ] 
       .o.		     [ m %> t ] (->) [ t %> t ]
       .o.		     [ [š|ṣ] %> t ] (->) [ l %> t ] 
       .o.		     [ h %> t ] (->) [ h %> h ] 
       .o.		     [ š %> t ] (->) [ s %> s ] ;

define FeminineRules FemEcolor .o. FemVoicing .o. FeminineAssimilations;


! ==============================================================
! Assyrian  vowel harmony
!
! If there is at least one preceding syllable, assimilate /a/
! of the penultimate open syllable into the vowel of the ultimate
! syllable. Allow morpheme boundaries to exist
! ==============================================================

define Boundary [[%> (C)] | [(C) %>]] ;
define LC [ Syllable Syllable* [[(%>) (C)] | [(C) (%>)]] ] ;

! @ OA|MA|NA (Kouwenberg 2017)
define VowelHarmony a (->) u || LC _ Boundary [u|ū] (%>) (C) .#. 
       .o.	    a (->) i || LC _ Boundary [i|ī] (%>) (C) .#.
       .o.	    a (->) e || LC _ Boundary [e|ē] (%>) (C) .#. ;


! ==============================================================
! Babylonian vowel harmony
!
! /a/ becomes /e/ if there is /i/ in the following syllable
! ==============================================================

! @ MB|SB|NB?|LB? (Kouwenberg 2011: 373)
define VowelHarmonyBab a (->) e || _ (%>) C (%>) (C) i ;


! ==============================================================
! Assyrian variation of V:C and VCC
! ==============================================================

! @ OA|MA|NA
define UtGemination [ ū t ] (->) [ u t t ] ;


! ==============================================================
! Loss of mimation
! ==============================================================

! @ MB|NB|LB|MA|NA (Kouwenberg 2011: 379)
define RemoveMimation [ %> m ] (->) 0 || _ [ .#. | %> ] ;


! ==============================================================
! Late apocope of short vowels in Late Babylonian
! ==============================================================

! @ LB (Kouwenberg 2011: 384)
! Must be handled on the morphological level!


! ==============================================================
! General assimilations
!
! Those marked with Bound are restricted to morpheme boundaries
! 
! N-assimilation should be composed first to avoid bleeding,
! e.g. bišimtu -> bišindu and not bišimtu -> bišindu -> bišiddu
!
! TODO: Regroup by dialect
!
! NAssimilation       indin -> iddin
! BoundBilabializat:  irub+ma -> irum+ma
! BoundRegressiveT:   lemun+tu -> lemut+tu
! Lateralization:     ištakar -> iltakar                     OB+
! InfixalTAssimil:    iztakar -> izzakar
! MAlveolarization:   imtahar -> indahar
!                     liktum+šu -> liktun+šu                 NB
!                     burrum+tu -> burrun+tu
! BoundAssibilation:  bīt+šu -> bīs+su, bīt+su
! RAssibilation       būr+tu -> būš+tu 
! BoundSibilantShin   piris+tu -> piriš-tu
! BoundGemination     iddin+ki -> iddik+ki
! BoundAssimiliation  libin+tu -> libit+tu
! ==============================================================

! @ All
define NAssimilation n (->) b || _ b
      .o.     	     n (->) d || _ d
      .o.     	     n (->) g || _ g
      .o.     	     n (->) h || _ h
      .o.     	     n (->) k || _ k
      .o.     	     n (->) l || _ l
      .o.     	     n (->) m || _ m
      .o.     	     n (->) p || _ p
      .o.     	     n (->) q || _ q
      .o.     	     n (->) r || _ r
      .o.     	     n (->) s || _ s
      .o.     	     n (->) š || _ š
      .o.     	     n (->) ṣ || _ ṣ
      .o.     	     n (->) t || _ [t|Ṫ]
      .o.     	     n (->) ṭ || _ ṭ
      .o.     	     n (->) z || _ z
      .o.     	     n (->) Aleph || _ Aleph
      .o.     	     n (->) w || _ w ;

! @ OB|MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 310)
define BoundBilabialization [p|b|n] (->) m || _ %> m ;

! @ OB|MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 310)
define BoundRegressiveT [d|n|ṭ] (->) t || _ %> t ; 

! @ MB|SB|MA|NA (Buccellati 1996: 37; Kouwenberg 2011: 371)
define Lateralization š (->) l || _ (%>) [t|d|ṭ|s] ;

! @ OB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 233)
define InfixalTAssimilation Ṫ -> z || z _
       .o.         	    Ṫ -> s || s _
       .o.         	    Ṫ -> ṣ || ṣ _
       .o.         	    Ṫ (->) ṭ || ṭ _ 
       .o.         	    Ṫ (->) d || d _ 
       .o.		    Ṫ (->) d || _ d
       .o.		    Ṫ (->) s || _ s 
       .o.		    Ṫ (->) z || _ z
       .o.		    Ṫ (->) š || _ š 
       .o.                  Ṫ (->) t;

! @ MA|NA (Kouwenberg 2011: 371)
define InfixalTEmphasis Ṫ (->) ṭ || q _ ;

! @ MA|NA (Kouwenberg 2011: 371)
define ShinAlveolar [ š b ] (->) [ s b ] ;

! ... T -> d || _ q ... T -> d m_ ;

! @ OB|MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 225)
define BoundSibilantShin [ṣ|s|z] (->) š || _ %> t ; 

! @ MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 37)
define MAlveolarization m (->) n || _ (%>) [t|d|ṭ|š] ;

define MAlveolarizationK m (->) n || _ (%>) k ;

! @ OB|MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 311; Kouwenberg 2011: 373)
define BoundAssibilation [ [t|d|ṭ|Aleph|s|z|ṣ|š] %> š ] (->) [ s %> s ]
       .o. 		 š (->) s || [t|d|ṭ] %> _ ;

! @ NA (Kouwenberg 2011: 378)
define LTtoSS [ [š|l] (%>) t ] (->) [ s (%>) s ] ;

! @ OB|MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 39)
define RAssimilation r (->) n || _ n ;

define RAssibilation r (->) š || _ %> t ;

! @ OB|MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 311-312)
define BoundGemination n (->) k || _ %> k
        .o.            n (->) š || _ %> š
	.o.            m (->) n || _ %> n
        .o.            m (->) š || _ %> š
        .o.            m (->) k || _ %> k 
	.o.	       m (->) Aleph || _ %> Aleph 
	.o.	       [ m %> š ] (->) [ s %> s ] ;

define BoundAssimilation Aleph (->) š || _ %> š ;

define ŠAlveolarization š (->) s || _ s ;
